California statutes. Civil Code
 shall apply only with respect to the location or branch at which the language in which the contract or agreement was negotiated is used.

(g) (1) The term “contract” or “agreement,” as used in this section, means the document creating the rights and obligations of the parties and includes any subsequent document making substantial changes in the rights and obligations of the parties. The term “contract” or “agreement” does not include any subsequent documents authorized or contemplated by the original document such as periodic statements, sales slips or invoices representing purchases made pursuant to a credit card agreement, a retail installment contract or account or other revolving sales or loan account, memoranda of purchases in an add-on sale, or refinancing of a purchase as provided by, or pursuant to, the original document.

(2) The term “contract” or
 “agreement” does not include a home improvement contract as defined in Sections 7151.2 and 7159 of the Business and Professions Code, nor does it include plans, specifications, description of work to be done and materials to be used, or collateral security taken or to be taken for the retail buyer’s obligation contained in a contract for the installation of goods by a contractor licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, if the home improvement contract or installation contract is otherwise a part of a contract described in subdivision (b).

(3) Matters ordinarily incorporated by reference in contracts or agreements as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), including, but not limited to, rules and regulations governing a tenancy and inventories of furnishings to be provided by the person described in subdivision (b), are not included in the term “contract” or
 “agreement.”

(h) (1) This section does not apply to a person engaged in a trade or business who negotiates primarily in a language other than English, as described by subdivision (b), if the party with whom that person is negotiating is a buyer of goods or services, or receives a loan or extension of credit, or enters an agreement obligating that party as a tenant, lessee, or sublessee, or similarly obligates the party by contract or lease, and the party negotiates the terms of the contract, lease, or other obligation through the party’s own interpreter.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “the party’s own interpreter” means a person who is not a minor and who is able to speak fluently and read with full understanding both the English language and any of the languages specified in subdivision (b) in which the contract, lease, or other obligation was
 negotiated, and who is not employed by, or whose service is not made available through, the person engaged in the trade or business.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to a contract or agreement described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (b).

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a translation may retain the following elements of the executed English-language contract or agreement without translation: names and titles of individuals and other persons, addresses, brand names, trade names, trademarks, registered service marks, full or abbreviated designations of the make and model of goods or services, alphanumeric codes, numerals, dollar amounts expressed in numerals, dates, and individual words or expressions having no generally accepted non-English translation. It is permissible, but not required, that this translation be signed.

(j) The terms of the contract or agreement that is executed in the English language shall determine the rights and obligations of the parties. However, the translation of the contract or the disclosures required by subdivision (e) in any of the languages specified in subdivision (b) in which the contract or agreement was negotiated shall be admissible in evidence only to show that no contract was entered into because of a substantial difference in the material terms and conditions of the contract and the translation.

(k) (1) Upon a failure to comply with the provisions of this section, the person aggrieved may rescind the contract or agreement in the manner provided by this chapter. If the contract for a consumer credit sale or consumer lease that has been sold and assigned to a financial institution is rescinded pursuant to this subdivision, the consumer shall make restitution to and have restitution made by
 the person with whom the consumer made the contract and shall give notice of rescission to the assignee. Notwithstanding that the contract was assigned without recourse, the assignment shall be deemed rescinded, and the assignor shall promptly repurchase the contract from the assignee.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), only a qualified commercial tenant may rescind a contract described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) pursuant to this subdivision. 

(l) Any waiver of a provision of this section is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable. 

(m) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Commercial real property” means all
 real property in this state, except dwelling units subject to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1940) of Title 5 of Part 4, mobilehomes, as defined in Section 798.3, and recreational vehicles, as defined in Section 799.29.

(2) “Microenterprise” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18000 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) “Nonprofit organization” means any private, nonprofit organization that qualifies under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(4) “Qualified commercial tenant” means a tenant of commercial real property that meets both of the following requirements:

(A) The tenant is a microenterprise, a restaurant with fewer than 10 employees, or a nonprofit organization with fewer than 20 employees.

(B) (i) Subject to clause (ii), the tenant has provided the landlord, within the prior 12 months, a written notice that the tenant is a qualified commercial tenant and a self-attestation regarding the number of employees, at such time the protections under this section come into place.

(ii) Unless the tenancy is from week to week, month to month, or other period less than a month, the tenant provided the notice and self-attestation described in clause (i) before or upon execution of the lease, and annually thereafter, at such time the protections under this section come into place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1015, Sec. 2.5.   (SB 1103)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1632.5.

(a) (1) A supervised financial organization that negotiates primarily in Spanish, Chinese, Tagalog, Vietnamese, or Korean, whether orally or in writing, in the course of entering into a contract or agreement for a loan or extension of credit secured by residential real property, shall deliver to the other party to that contract or agreement prior to the execution of the contract or agreement the applicable form or forms described in subdivision (i) for that language.

(2) A supervised financial organization that negotiates the modification of any of the terms of a loan or extension of credit secured by residential real property primarily in Spanish, Chinese, Tagalog, Vietnamese, or Korean, and that offers a borrower a final loan modification in
 writing, shall deliver to that borrower, at the time the final loan modification offer is made, one of the forms described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (i) summarizing the modified terms of the loan in the same language as the negotiation.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Contract” or “agreement” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 1632.

(2) “Supervised financial organization” means a bank, savings association, as defined in Section 5102 of the Financial Code, credit union, or holding company, affiliate, or subsidiary thereof, or any person subject to Division 7 (commencing with Section 18000), Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000), or Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code.

(c) (1) With respect to a contract or agreement for a loan or extension of credit secured by residential real property as described in subdivision (a), a supervised financial organization that complies with this section shall be deemed in compliance with Section 1632.

(2) Except with respect to a loan or extension of credit described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), a supervised financial organization that complies with Section 1632, with respect to a contract or agreement for a loan or extension of credit secured by residential real property as described in subdivision (a), shall be deemed in compliance with this section.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), the supervised financial organization shall provide the Good Faith Estimate disclosure form described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) to the borrower no later than three
 business days after receipt of the written application, and if any of the loan terms summarized materially change after provision of the translated form but prior to consummation of the loan, the supervised financial organization shall provide an updated version of the translated form prior to consummation of the loan.

(2) For a transaction subject to subsection (e) of Section 1026.19 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the supervised financial organization shall provide the Loan Estimate form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) translated in the applicable language no later than three business days after receipt of the written application. If any of the summarized loan terms materially change after provision of the Loan Estimate form but prior to consummation of the loan, the supervised financial organization shall provide an updated version of the translated form prior to consummation of the loan.

(3) For a transaction subject to subsection (f) of Section 1026.19 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the supervised financial organization shall provide the Closing Disclosure form described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (i) translated in the applicable language at least three business days prior to consummation of the loan.

(e) (1) This section does not apply to a supervised financial organization that negotiates primarily in a language other than English, as described by subdivision (a), if the party with whom the supervised financial organization is negotiating, negotiates the terms of the contract through the party’s own interpreter.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “the party’s own interpreter” means a person, not a minor, who is able to speak fluently and read with full
 understanding both the English language and one of the languages specified in subdivision (a) that is the language in which the contract was negotiated, who is not employed by, and whose services are not made available through, the person engaged in the trade or business.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a translated form may retain any of the following elements of the executed English language contract or agreement without translation:

(1) Names and titles of individuals and other persons.

(2) Addresses, brand names, trade names, trademarks, or registered service marks.

(3) Full or abbreviated designations of the make and model of goods or services.

(4) Alphanumeric codes.

(5) Individual words or expressions having no generally accepted non-English translation.

(g) The terms of the contract or agreement that is executed in the English language shall determine the rights and obligations of the parties. However, the translation of the forms described in subdivision (i) and required by subdivision (a) shall be admissible in evidence only to show that no contract or agreement was entered into because of a substantial difference in the material terms and conditions of the contract or agreement and the prior translated forms provided to the borrower.

(h) (1) A licensing agency may, by order, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, levy administrative penalties against a supervised financial organization that violates any provision of this section, and the
 supervised financial organization may be liable for administrative penalties, up to the amounts of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first violation, five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the second violation, and ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each subsequent violation. Except for licensing agencies exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, any hearing shall be held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and the licensing agency shall have all the powers granted under that act.

(2) A licensing agency may exercise any and all authority and powers available to it under any other provisions of law to administer and enforce this section, including, but not limited to, investigating and examining the licensed person’s books and records, and charging and collecting the reasonable costs for these
 activities. The licensing agency shall not charge a licensed person twice for the same service. Any civil, criminal, and administrative authority and remedies available to the licensing agency pursuant to its licensing law may be sought and employed in any combination deemed advisable by the licensing agency to enforce the provisions of this section.

(3) Any supervised financial organization that violates this section shall be deemed to have violated its licensing law.

(4) This section shall not be construed to impair or impede the Attorney General from bringing an action to enforce this division.

(i) The Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall make available each of the following forms based on existing forms in each of the languages set forth in subdivision (a) for use by a supervised financial
 organization to summarize the terms of a mortgage loan pursuant to subdivision (a). In making available the forms, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation may use as guidance the following existing forms:

(1) The Good Faith Estimate disclosure form from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(2) The Loan Estimate form from the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau.

(3) The Closing Disclosure form from the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau.

(4) The Agreement for Modification, Re-Amortization, or Extension of a Mortgage (Form 181), the Loan Modification Agreement (Providing for Fixed Interest Rate) (Form 3179), and the Loan Modification Agreement (Providing for Adjustable Interest Rate) (Form 3161) from the Federal
 National Mortgage Association.

(j) This section does not apply to federally chartered banks, credit unions, savings banks, or thrifts.

(k) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (h), this section shall not be construed to create or enhance any claim, right of action, or civil liability that did not previously exist under state law, or limit any claim, right of action, or civil liability that otherwise exists under state law.

(l) An action against a supervised financial organization for a violation of this section may only be brought by a licensing agency or by the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 18.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Stats. 2018, Ch. 356, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an application by a prospective customer to enter into a brokerage agreement with a broker-dealer, which application is transmitted electronically and is accompanied by the prospective customer’s electronic signature or digital signature as described in subdivisions (d), (e), (f), and (g), shall be deemed, upon acceptance by the broker-dealer, to be a fully executed, valid, enforceable, and irrevocable written contract, unless grounds exist which would render any other contract invalid,
 unenforceable, or revocable.

(b) Nothing in this section abrogates or limits any existing law that would otherwise apply to contracts governed by this section, or any theory of liability or any remedy otherwise available at law.

(c) “Broker-dealer,” for purposes of this section, means any broker-dealer licensed pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 25200) of Division 1 of Title 4 of the Corporations Code or exempted from licensing pursuant thereto.

(d) “Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

(e) “Electronic record” means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored electronically.

(f) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record.

(g) “Digital signature,” for the purposes of this section, means an electronic identifier, created by a computer, that is intended by the party using it to have the same force and effect as the use of a manual signature. The use of a digital signature shall have the same force or effect as a manual signature if it embodies all of the following attributes:

(1) It is unique to the person using it.

(2) It is capable of verification.

(3) It is under the sole control of the person using
 it.

(4) It is linked to data in a manner that if the data is changed, the digital signature is invalidated.

(h) The use of an electronic signature or digital signature shall have the same force or effect as a manual signature.

(i) The application that is transmitted electronically pursuant to subdivision (a) shall comply with all applicable federal and state securities laws and regulations relating to disclosures to prospective customers. Unless those laws and regulations currently require disclosures to be displayed or printed in bold, to be of specific type or print size, and to be placed prominently at specified locations within the application, the disclosures shall be displayed prominently and printed in capital letters, in bold type and displayed or printed immediately above the signature line. Disclosures
 shall be written in plain English. The full text of the disclosures shall be contained in the application as required by this subdivision.

(j) Whenever a disclosure to a prospective customer is required under federal or state law or regulation to be confirmed as having been made, the application that is transmitted electronically pursuant to subdivision (a) shall provide a means by which the prospective customer shall confirm that he or she has read the disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 213, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2.5. ELECTRONIC TRANSACTIONS [1633.1. - 1633.17.]

1633.1.

This title may be cited as the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.2.

In this title the following terms have the following definitions:

(a) “Agreement” means the bargain of the parties in fact, as found in their language or inferred from other circumstances and from rules, regulations, and procedures given the effect of agreements under laws otherwise applicable to a particular transaction.

(b) “Automated transaction” means a transaction conducted or performed, in whole or in part, by electronic means or electronic records, in which the acts or records of one or both parties are not reviewed by an individual in the ordinary course in forming a contract, performing under an existing contract, or fulfilling an obligation required by the transaction.

(c) “Computer program” means a set of statements or instructions to be used directly or indirectly in an information processing system in order to bring about a certain result.

(d) “Contract” means the total legal obligation resulting from the parties’ agreement as affected by this title and other applicable law.

(e) “Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic,
 wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

(f) “Electronic agent” means a computer program or an electronic or other automated means used independently to initiate an action or respond to electronic records or performances in whole or in part, without review by an individual.

(g) “Electronic record” means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.

(h) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record. For purposes of this title, a “digital signature” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 16.5 of the Government Code is a type of electronic signature.

(i) “Governmental agency” means an executive, legislative, or judicial agency, department, board, commission, authority, institution, or instrumentality of the federal government or of a state or of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of a state.

(j) “Information” means data, text, images, sounds, codes, computer programs, software, databases, or the like.

(k) “Information processing system” means an electronic system for creating, generating, sending, receiving, storing, displaying, or processing information.

(l) “Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, governmental agency, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial
 entity.

(m) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(n) “Security procedure” means a procedure employed for the purpose of verifying that an electronic signature, record, or performance is that of a specific person or for detecting changes or errors in the information in an electronic record. The term includes a procedure that requires the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying words or numbers, encryption, or callback or other acknowledgment procedures.

(o) “Transaction” means an action or set of actions occurring between two or more persons relating to the conduct of business, commercial, or governmental affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 144, Sec. 2.   (AB 2296)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), this title applies to electronic records and electronic signatures relating to a transaction.

(b) This title does not apply to transactions subject to any of the following laws:

(1) A law governing the creation and execution of wills, codicils, or testamentary trusts.

(2) Division 1 (commencing with Section 1101) of the Uniform Commercial Code, except Sections 1206 and 1306.

(3) Divisions 3 (commencing with Section 3101), 4 (commencing with Section 4101), 5 (commencing with Section 5101), 8 (commencing with
 Section 8101), 9 (commencing with Section 9101), and 11 (commencing with Section 11101) of the Uniform Commercial Code.

(4) A law that requires that specifically identifiable text or disclosures in a record or a portion of a record be separately signed, including initialed, from the record. However, this paragraph does not apply to Section 1677 or 1678 of this code or Section 1298 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) This title does not apply to any specific transaction described in Section 17511.5 of the Business and Professions Code, Section 798.14, 1133, or 1134 of, Section 1689.6, 1689.7, or 1689.13 of, Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1695) of Title 5 of Part 2 of Division 3 of, Section 1720, 1785.15, 1789.14, 1789.16, or 1793.23 of, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1801) of Title 2 of Part 4 of Division 3 of, Section 1861.24, 1862.5, 1917.712, 1917.713, 1950.6, 1983,
 2924b, 2924c, 2924f, 2924i, 2924j, 2924.3, or 2937 of, Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 2945) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of, Section 2954.5 or 2963 of, Chapter 2b (commencing with Section 2981) or 2d (commencing with Section 2985.7) of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of, Section 3071.5 of, Part 5 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 4 of, or Part 5.3 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 4 of, this code, subdivision (b) of Section 18608 or Section 22328 of the Financial Code, Section 1358.15, 1365, 1368.01, 1368.1, 1371, or 18035.5 of the Health and Safety Code, Section 786 as it applies to individual and group disability policies, 10199.44, 10199.46, 10235.16, 10235.40, 11624.09, or 11624.1 of the Insurance Code, Section 779.1, 10010.1, or 16482 of the Public Utilities Code, or Section 9975 or 11738 of the Vehicle Code. An electronic record may not be substituted for any notice that is required to be sent pursuant to Section 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure. This
 subdivision does not prohibit the recordation of any document with a county recorder by electronic means.

(d) This title applies to an electronic record or electronic signature otherwise excluded from the application of this title under subdivision (b) when used for a transaction subject to a law other than those specified in subdivision (b).

(e) A transaction subject to this title is also subject to other applicable substantive law.

(f) The exclusion of a transaction from the application of this title under subdivision (b) or (c) shall be construed only to exclude the transaction from the application of this title, but shall not be construed to prohibit the transaction from being conducted by electronic means if the transaction may be conducted by electronic means under any other applicable law.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), this title shall apply to electronic records and electronic signatures relating to transactions conducted by a person licensed, certified, or registered pursuant to the Alarm Company Act (Chapter 11.6 (commencing with Section 7590) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code) for purposes of activities authorized by Section 7599.54 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 374, Sec. 5.   (AB 1697)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.4.

This title applies to any electronic record or electronic signature created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.5.

(a) This title does not require a record or signature to be created, generated, sent, communicated, received, stored, or otherwise processed or used by electronic means or in electronic form.

(b) This title applies only to a transaction between parties each of which has agreed to conduct the transaction by electronic means. Whether the parties agree to conduct a transaction by electronic means is determined from the context and surrounding circumstances, including the parties’
 conduct. Except for a separate and optional agreement the primary purpose of which is to authorize a transaction to be conducted by electronic means, an agreement to conduct a transaction by electronic means may not be contained in a standard form contract that is not an electronic record. An agreement in such a standard form contract may not be conditioned upon an agreement to conduct transactions by electronic means. An agreement to conduct a transaction by electronic means may not be inferred solely from the fact that a party has used electronic means to pay an account or register a purchase or warranty. This subdivision may not be varied by agreement.

(c) A party that agrees to conduct a transaction by electronic means may refuse to conduct other transactions by electronic means. If a seller sells goods or services by both electronic and nonelectronic means and a buyer purchases the goods or services by conducting the transaction by
 electronic means, the buyer may refuse to conduct further transactions regarding the goods or services by electronic means. This subdivision may not be varied by agreement.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in this title, the effect of any of its provisions may be varied by agreement. The presence in certain provisions of this title of the words “unless otherwise agreed,” or words of similar import, does not imply that the effect of other provisions may not be varied by agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.6.

This title shall be construed and applied according to all of the following:

(1) To facilitate electronic transactions consistent with other applicable law.

(2) To be consistent with reasonable practices concerning electronic transactions and with the continued expansion of those practices.

(3) To effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the
 subject of this title among states enacting it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.7.

(a) A record or signature may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form.

(b) A contract may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because an electronic record was used in its formation.

(c) If a law requires a record to be in writing, an electronic record satisfies the law.

(d) If a law
 requires a signature, an electronic signature satisfies the law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.8.

(a) If parties have agreed to conduct a transaction by electronic means and a law requires a person to provide, send, or deliver information in writing to another person, that requirement is satisfied if the information is provided, sent, or delivered, as the case may be, in an electronic record capable of retention by the recipient at the time of receipt. An electronic record is not capable of retention by the recipient if the sender or its information processing system inhibits the ability of the recipient to print or store the electronic
 record.

(b) If a law other than this title requires a record to be posted or displayed in a certain manner, to be sent, communicated, or transmitted by a specified method, or to contain information that is formatted in a certain manner, all of the following rules apply:

(1) The record shall be posted or displayed in the manner specified in the other law.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), the record shall be sent, communicated, or transmitted by the method specified in the other law.

(3) The record shall contain the information formatted in the manner specified in the other law.

(c) If a sender inhibits the ability of a recipient to store or print an
 electronic record, the electronic record is not enforceable against the recipient.

(d) The requirements of this section may not be varied by agreement, except as follows:

(1) To the extent a law other than this title requires information to be provided, sent, or delivered in writing but permits that requirement to be varied by agreement, the requirement under subdivision (a) that the information be in the form of an electronic record capable of retention may also be varied by agreement.

(2) A requirement under a law other than this title to send, communicate, or transmit a record by first-class mail may be varied by agreement to the extent permitted by the other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.9.

(a) An electronic record or electronic signature is attributable to a person if it was the act of the person. The act of the person may be shown in any manner, including a showing of the efficacy of any security procedure applied to determine the person to which the electronic record or electronic signature was attributable.

(b) The effect of an electronic record or electronic signature attributed to a person under subdivision (a) is determined from the context and surrounding
 circumstances at the time of its creation, execution, or adoption, including the parties’ agreement, if any, and otherwise as provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.10.

If a change or error in an electronic record occurs in a transmission between parties to a transaction, the following rules apply:

(1) If the parties have agreed to use a security procedure to detect changes or errors and one party has conformed to the procedure, but the other party has not, and the nonconforming party would have detected the change or error had that party also conformed, the conforming party may avoid the effect of the changed or erroneous electronic record.

(2) In an automated transaction involving an individual, the individual may avoid the effect of an electronic record that resulted from an error made by the individual in dealing with the electronic agent of another person if the electronic agent did not provide an opportunity for the prevention or correction of the error and, at the time the individual learns of the error, all of the following conditions are met:

(i) The individual promptly notifies the other person of the error and that the individual did not intend to be bound by the electronic record received by the other person.

(ii) The individual takes reasonable steps, including steps that conform to the other person’s reasonable instructions, to return to the other person or, if instructed by the other person, to destroy the consideration received, if any, as a
 result of the erroneous electronic record.

(iii)The individual has not used or received any benefit or value from the consideration, if any, received from the other person.

(3) If neither paragraph (1) nor (2) applies, the change or error has the effect provided by other law, including the law of mistake, and the parties’ contract, if any.

(4) Paragraphs (2) and (3) may not be varied by agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.11.

(a) If a law requires that a signature be notarized, the requirement is satisfied with respect to an electronic signature if an electronic record includes, in addition to the electronic signature to be notarized, the electronic signature of a notary public together with all other information required to be included in a notarization by other applicable law.

(b) In a transaction, if a law requires that a statement be signed under penalty of perjury, the requirement is
 satisfied with respect to an electronic signature, if an electronic record includes, in addition to the electronic signature, all of the information as to which the declaration pertains together with a declaration under penalty of perjury by the person who submits the electronic signature that the information is true and correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.12.

(a) If a law requires that a record be retained, the requirement is satisfied by retaining an electronic record of the information in the record, if the electronic record reflects accurately the information set forth in the record at the time it was first generated in its final form as an electronic record or otherwise, and the electronic record remains accessible for later reference.

(b) A requirement to retain a record in accordance with subdivision (a) does not apply to
 any information the sole purpose of which is to enable the record to be sent, communicated, or received.

(c) A person may satisfy subdivision (a) by using the services of another person if the requirements of subdivision (a) are satisfied.

(d) If a law requires a record to be retained in its original form, or provides consequences if the record is not retained in its original form, that law is satisfied by an electronic record retained in accordance with subdivision (a).

(e) If a law requires retention of a check, that requirement is satisfied by retention of an electronic record of the information on the front and back of the check in accordance with subdivision (a).

(f) A record retained as an electronic record in accordance with subdivision (a)
 satisfies a law requiring a person to retain a record for evidentiary, audit, or like purposes, unless a law enacted after the effective date of this title specifically prohibits the use of an electronic record for a specified purpose.

(g) This section does not preclude a governmental agency from specifying additional requirements for the retention of a record subject to the agency’s jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.13.

In a proceeding, evidence of a record or signature may not be excluded solely because it is in electronic form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.14.

(a) In an automated transaction, the following rules apply:

(1) A contract may be formed by the interaction of electronic agents of the parties, even if no individual was aware of or reviewed the electronic agents’ actions or the resulting terms and agreements.

(2) A contract may be formed by the interaction of an electronic agent and an individual, acting on the individual’s own behalf or for another person,
 including by an interaction in which the individual performs actions that the individual is free to refuse to perform and which the individual knows or has reason to know will cause the electronic agent to complete the transaction or performance.

(b) The terms of the contract are determined by the substantive law applicable to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.15.

(a) Unless the sender and the recipient agree to a different method of sending that is reasonable under the circumstances, an electronic record is sent when the information is addressed properly or otherwise directed properly to the recipient and either (1) enters an information processing system outside the control of the sender or of a person that sent the electronic record on behalf of the sender, or (2) enters a region of an information processing system that is under the control of the recipient.

(b) Unless the sender and the recipient agree to a different method of receiving that is reasonable under the circumstances, an electronic record is received when the electronic record enters an information processing system that the recipient has designated or uses for the purpose of receiving electronic records or information of the type sent, in a form capable of being processed by that system, and from which the recipient is able to retrieve the electronic record.

(c) Subdivision (b) applies even if the place the information processing system is located is different from the place the electronic record is deemed to be received under subdivision (d).
